Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB322.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 199.8982 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The cabinet shall establish a family child-care home certification program
which shall be administered by the department. A family child-care provider
shall apply for certification of the provider's home if the provider is caring for
four (4) to six (6) children unrelated to the provider. A family child-care
provider caring for three (3) or fewer children may apply for certification of
the provider's home at the discretion of the provider. Applicants for
certification shall not have been found by the cabinet or a court to have
abused or neglected a child, and shall meet the following minimum
requirements:
1. Submit two (2) written character references;
2. Provide a written statement from a physician or advanced practice
registered nurse that the applicant is in good health;
3. Submit to a criminal record check in accordance with KRS 199.8965;
4. Provide smoke detectors, a telephone, an adequate water supply,
sufficient lighting and space, and a safe environment in the residence in
which care is provided;
5. Provide a copy of the results of a tuberculosis risk assessment and the
results of any appropriate follow-up with skin testing or chest X-ray for
applicants who are determined to be at risk for developing tuberculosis
in accordance with the recommendations of the Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention within thirty (30) days of the date of application
for certification; and
6. Demonstrate completion of a total of at least six (6) hours of training in
the following areas within three (3) months of application for
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 12/5/2025 1:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1314
certification:
a. Basic health, safety, and sanitation;
b. Recognizing and reporting child abuse; and
c. Developmentally appropriate child-care practice.
(b) Initial applications for certification shall be made to the department. The
cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to establish fees that shall
not exceed costs of the program to the cabinet, for proper administration of
the certification. The department shall issue a certificate of operation upon
inspecting the family child-care home and determining the provider's
compliance with the provisions of this section. The inspection shall be
unannounced. A certificate of operation issued pursuant to this section shall
not be transferable and shall be renewed every two (2) years for a fee that
shall not exceed costs of the program to the cabinet for renewal.
(c) A certified family child-care provider shall display the certificate of operation
in a prominent place within the residence in which care is provided. The
cabinet shall provide the certified family child-care provider with written
information explaining the requirements for a family day-care provider and
instructions on the method of reporting violations of the requirements which
the provider shall distribute to parents.
(d) Upon request of any person, the cabinet shall provide information regarding
the denial, revocation, suspension, or violation of any type of day-care license
of the family child-care provider. Identifying information regarding children
and their families shall remain confidential.
(e) The cabinet shall provide, upon request, public information regarding the
inspections of and the plans of correction for the family child-care home
within the past year. All information distributed by the cabinet under this
paragraph shall include a statement indicating that the reports as provided
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 12/5/2025 1:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1314
under this paragraph from the past five (5) years are available from the family
child-care home upon the parent's, custodian's, guardian's, or other interested
person's request.
(f) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A which establish standards for the issuance, monitoring,
release of information under this section and KRS 199.896 and 199.898,
renewal, denial, revocation, and suspension of a certificate of operation for a
family child-care home and establish criteria for the denial of certification if
criminal records indicate convictions that may impact the safety and security
of children in care. A denial, suspension, or revocation of a certificate may be
appealed, and upon appeal an administrative hearing shall be conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. If the cabinet has probable cause to
believe that there is an immediate threat to the public health, safety, or
welfare, the cabinet may take emergency action to suspend a certificate
pursuant to KRS 13B.125. The cabinet shall promulgate administrative
regulations to impose minimum staff-to-child ratios. The cabinet may
promulgate administrative regulations relating to other requirements
necessary to ensure minimum safety in family child-care homes. The cabinet
shall develop and provide an "easy-to-read" guide containing the following
information to a family child-care provider seeking certification of his home:
1. Certification requirements and procedures;
2. Information about available child-care training; and
3. Child-care food sponsoring organizations.
(2) Family child-care providers shall annually demonstrate to the department
completion of at least six (6) hours of training in child development. These hours
shall include but are not limited to one and one-half (1.5) hours one (1) time every
five (5) years of continuing education in the recognition and prevention of pediatric
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 12/5/2025 1:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1314
abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS 620.020. Training in recognizing pediatric
abusive head trauma may be designed in collaboration with organizations and
agencies that specialize in the prevention and recognition of pediatric abusive head
trauma approved by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
The one and one-half (1.5) hours of continuing education required under this
section shall be included in the current number of required continuing education
hours.
(3) The cabinet shall, either through the development of or approval of, make available
a model training curriculum and training materials, including video instructional
materials, to cover the areas specified in subsection (1)(a)6. of this section. The
cabinet shall develop or approve the model training curriculum and training
materials to cover the areas specified in subsection (1)(a)6. of this section.
(4) (a) As used in this subsection "local government" means a city, county, charter
county, urban-county government, consolidated local government, or unified
local government.
(b) The provisions of this section shall supersede all local government ordinances
or regulations pertaining to the certification, licensure, and training
requirements related to the operation of family child-care homes and no local
government shall adopt or enforce any additional licensure, certification, or
training requirements specifically applicable to family child-care homes in
addition to those provided in this section. This subsection shall not be
interpreted or construed to exempt family child-care homes from compliance
with local government ordinances and regulations that apply generally within
the jurisdiction.
(c) Because the availability of adequate child-care as an essential business is vital
to the Commonwealth's state and local economies, by January 1, 2022, a local
government that has adopted land use regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 12/5/2025 1:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1314
100 shall specifically name family child-care homes in the text of its zoning
regulations to authorize the board of adjustments to separately consider the
applications of proposed family child-care homes for conditional use permits
within the residential zones of the planning unit where they are not a fully
permitted use pursuant to KRS 100.237.
(5) Notwithstanding any state law or administrative regulation to the contrary, a
child-care provider on a military installation or military facility that is licensed or
certified as a family child-care provider by the United States Department of
Defense, any branch of the Armed Forces as defined in KRS 40.010, the National
Guard, or reserve component thereof shall be exempt from the requirements of
this section.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 12/5/2025 1:08 PM Jacketed